Washington statutes.
RCW 35.53.070

Termination of trust in certain property—Receivership—Regulations.

In such an action the court after acquiring jurisdiction shall proceed as in the case of a receivership except that the city or town shall serve as trustee in lieu of a receiver.

The assets of the improvement districts involved shall be sold at such prices and in such manner as the court may deem advisable and be applied to the costs and expenses of the action and the liquidation of the bonds and warrants of the districts or revenue bonds to which utility local improvement assessments are pledged to pay.

No notice to present claims other than the summons in the action shall be necessary. Any claim presented shall be accompanied by the bonds and warrants upon which it is based. Dividends upon any bonds or warrants for which no claim was filed shall be paid into the general fund of the city or town, but the owner thereof may obtain it at any time within five years thereafter upon surrender and cancellation of his or her bonds and warrants.

Upon the termination of the receivership the city or town shall be discharged from all trusts relating to the property, funds, bonds, and warrants involved in the action.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2091; 1967 c 52 s 23; 1965 c 7 s 35.53.070. Prior: 1929 c 142 s 1, part; RRS s 9384-1, part.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1967 c 52: See notes following RCW 35.43.042.